New Jersey, session 222, S3861.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  An institution of higher education shall submit an annual report on or before July 1 of each year to the Secretary of Higher Education concerning student parents. The report shall include: (1)  the number of full-time and part-time student parents enrolled in the institution, disaggregated by demographic subgroups; and (2)  data on the academic outcomes of student parents, including transfer, withdrawal, and graduation rates. b.  An institution shall post the report prepared pursuant to subsection a. of this section on the Internet website of the institution. c.  The secretary shall prepare an annual report containing a compilation of the data collected pursuant to subsection a. of this section. The secretary shall post the report on the Internet website of the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education. d.  Data collected and made available pursuant to this section shall be subject to the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, (20 U.S.C. s.1232g) and any other State or federal laws applicable to the confidentiality and privacy of student records. The data made available shall not include personal identifying information, which shall be deemed confidential. e. As used in this section, student parent means a student enrolled in an undergraduate degree program of an institution of higher education who is the parent or legal guardian of a child under 18 years of age. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.